Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-302 Rights of purchaser. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), a purchaser of a
certificated or uncertificated security acquires all rights in the security
that the transferor had or had power to transfer.

(b) A purchaser of a limited interest acquires
rights only to the extent of the interest purchased.

(c) A purchaser of a certificated security who
as a previous holder had notice of an adverse claim does not improve its
position by taking from a protected purchaser. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2; am L
2000, c 241, §26]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next